Mississippi statutes. Title 61. Aviation
Chapter 4. Mississippi Wayport Authority Act

§§ 61-4-1 through 61-4-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 404, § 8, effective July 1, 2017.

§61-4-1. [Laws, 1989, ch. 535, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).]

§61-4-3. [Laws, 1989, ch. 535, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).]

§61-4-5. [Laws, 1989, ch. 535, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).]

§ 61-4-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 402, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

§61-4-7. [Laws, 1989, ch. 535, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).]

§§ 61-4-9 through 61-4-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 404, § 8 effective July 1, 2017.

§61-4-9. [Laws, 1989, ch. 535, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).]

§61-4-11. [Laws, 1989, ch. 535, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).]

§61-4-13. [Laws, 1989, ch. 535, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).]